North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-02.1 Abortion Control Act
14-02.1-03.2.
Civil damages for performance of abortions without informed consent.

Any person upon whom an abortion has been performed without informed consent as required by sections 14-02.1-02, 14-02.1-02.1, subsection 1 of section 14-02.1-03, 14-02.1-03.2, and 14-02.1-03.3 may maintain an action against the person who performed the abortion for ten thousand dollars in punitive damages and treble whatever actual damages the plaintiff may have sustained. Any person upon whom an abortion has been attempted without complying with sections 14-02.1-02, 14-02.1-02.1, subsection 1 of section 14-02.1-03, 14-02.1-03.2, and 14-02.1-03.3 may maintain an action against the person who attempted to perform the abortion for five thousand dollars in punitive damages and treble whatever actual damages the plaintiff may have sustained.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 141, § 5.

14-02.1-03.3.
Privacy of woman upon whom an abortion is performed or attempted.

In every proceeding or action brought under section 14-02.1-03.2, the court shall rule whether the anonymity of any woman upon whom an abortion is performed or attempted should be preserved from public disclosure if she does not give her consent to such disclosure. The court, upon motion or sua sponte, shall make such a ruling and, upon determining that her anonymity should be preserved, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel, and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion of individuals from courtrooms or hearing rooms, to the extent necessary to safeguard her identity from public disclosure. Each such order must be accompanied by specific written findings explaining why the anonymity of the woman should be preserved from public disclosure, why the order is essential to that end, how the order is narrowly tailored to serve that interest, and why no reasonable less restrictive alternative exists. This section may not be construed to conceal the identity of the plaintiff or of witnesses from the defendant.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 141, § 6.

14-02.1-03.4.
Required notice at abortion facility. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Any abortion facility that performs abortions shall display signs that contain exclusively the following words: “NOTICE: No one can force you to have an abortion. It is against the law for a spouse, a boyfriend, a parent, a friend, a medical care provider, or any other person to in any way force you to have an abortion.”

The signs must be located so that the signs can be read easily and in areas that ensure maximum visibility to women at the time a woman gives consent to an abortion.

The display of signs pursuant to this section does not discharge any other legal duty of an abortion facility or physician.

The state department of health shall make the signs required by this section available for download in a printable format on its internet website.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 143, § 1.

14-02.1-03.4.
Required notice at abortion facility. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Any abortion facility that performs abortions shall display signs that contain exclusively the following words: “NOTICE: No one can force you to have an abortion. It is against the law for a spouse, a boyfriend, a parent, a friend, a medical care provider, or any other person to in any way force you to have an abortion.”

The signs must be located so that the signs can be read easily and in areas that ensure maximum visibility to women at the time a woman gives consent to an abortion.

The display of signs pursuant to this section does not discharge any other legal duty of an abortion facility or physician.

The department of health and human services shall make the signs required by this section available for download in a printable format on its internet website.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 143, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 28, effective September 1, 2022.

14-02.1-03.5.
Abortion-inducing drugs.

For purposes of this chapter, an abortion accomplished by the use of an abortion-inducing drug is deemed to occur when the drug is prescribed, in the case of a prescription, or when the drug is administered directly to the woman by the physician.

It is unlawful to knowingly give, sell, dispense, administer, otherwise provide, or prescribe any abortion-inducing drug to a pregnant woman for the purpose of inducing an abortion in that pregnant woman, or enabling another person to induce an abortion in a pregnant woman, unless the person who gives, sells, dispenses, administers, or otherwise provides or prescribes the abortion-inducing drug is a physician, and the provision or prescription of the abortion-inducing drug satisfies the protocol tested and authorized by the federal food and drug administration and as outlined in the label for the abortion-inducing drug.

Every pregnant woman to whom a physician gives, sells, dispenses, administers, otherwise provides, or prescribes any abortion-inducing drug must be provided with a copy of the drug’s label.

Any physician who gives, sells, dispenses, administers, prescribes, or otherwise provides an abortion-inducing drug shall enter a signed contract with another physician who agrees to handle emergencies associated with the use or ingestion of the abortion-inducing drug. The physician shall produce the signed contract on demand by the patient, the state department of health, or a criminal justice agency. Every pregnant woman to whom a physician gives, sells, dispenses, administers, prescribes, or otherwise provides any abortion-inducing drug must be provided the name and telephone number of the physician who will be handling emergencies and the hospital at which any emergencies will be handled. The physician who contracts to handle emergencies must have active admitting privileges and gynecological and surgical privileges at the hospital designated to handle any emergencies associated with the use or ingestion of the abortion-inducing drug.

When an abortion-inducing drug or chemical is used for the purpose of inducing an abortion, the drug or chemical must be administered by or in the same room and in the physical presence of the physician who prescribed, dispensed, or otherwise provided the drug or chemical to the patient.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 109, § 6.

14-02.1-04.
Limitations on the performance of abortions — Penalty.

An abortion may not be performed by any person other than a physician who is using applicable medical standards and who is licensed to practice in this state. All physicians performing abortion procedures must have admitting privileges at a hospital located within thirty miles [42.28 kilometers] of the abortion facility and staff privileges to replace hospital on-staff physicians at that hospital. These privileges must include the abortion procedures the physician will be performing at abortion facilities. An abortion facility must have a staff member trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation present at all times when the abortion facility is open and abortions are scheduled to be performed.

After the first twelve weeks of pregnancy but prior to the time at which the unborn child may reasonably be expected to have reached viability, no abortion may be performed in any facility other than a licensed hospital.

After the point in pregnancy when the unborn child may reasonably be expected to have reached viability, no abortion may be performed except in a hospital, and then only if in the medical judgment of the physician the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the woman or if in the physician’s medical judgment the continuation of her pregnancy will impose on her a substantial risk of grave impairment of her physical or mental health.

An abortion facility may not perform an abortion on a woman without first offering the woman an opportunity to receive and view at the abortion facility or another facility an active ultrasound of her unborn child. The offer and opportunity to receive and view an ultrasound must occur at least twenty-four hours before the abortion is scheduled to be performed. The active ultrasound image must be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community, contain the dimensions of the unborn child, and accurately portray the presence of external members and internal organs, including the heartbeat, if present or viewable, of the unborn child. The auscultation of the fetal heart tone must be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community. The abortion facility shall document the woman’s response to the offer, including the date and time of the offer and the woman’s signature attesting to her informed decision.

Any physician who performs an abortion without complying with the provisions of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

It is a class B felony for any person, other than a physician licensed under chapter 43-17, to perform an abortion in this state.

An abortion under this subsection may only be performed if the above-mentioned medical judgment of the physician who is to perform the abortion is first certified by the physician in writing, setting forth in detail the facts upon which the physician relies in making this judgment and if this judgment has been concurred in by two other licensed physicians who have examined the patient. The foregoing certification and concurrence is not required in the case of an emergency when the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the patient.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 191, § 4; 2009, ch. 144, § 1; 2011, ch. 109, § 7; 2013, ch. 118, § 1.

14-02.1-04.1
Prohibition — Sex-selective abortion — Abortion for genetic abnormality — Penalty.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician may not intentionally perform or attempt to perform an abortion with knowledge that the pregnant woman is seeking the abortion solely:

On account of the sex of the unborn child; or

Because the unborn child has been diagnosed with either a genetic abnormality or a potential for a genetic abnormality.

Any physician who performs an abortion in violation of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 117, § 2.

14-02.1-04.2
Prohibition on human dismemberment abortion — Penalty. [Contingent effective date – See note]

For purposes of this section, “human dismemberment abortion” means intentionally dismembering a living unborn child and extracting the unborn child one piece at a time from a uterus, with the purpose of causing the death of an unborn child, through use of clamps, grasping forceps, tongs, scissors, or similar instruments that, through the convergence of two rigid levers, slice, crush, or grasp the head, arm, leg, spinal cord, internal organ, or other portion of the unborn child’s body to cut or rip it off, regardless if the fetal body parts are removed by the same instrument, suction, or other means.

Except in the case of a medical emergency, it is a class C felony for an individual to intentionally perform a human dismemberment abortion.

A woman upon whom a human dismemberment abortion is performed or attempted to be performed in violation of subsection 2 may not be prosecuted for a violation of subsection 2 or for conspiracy to violate subsection 2.

Source:

Contingently enacted by S.L. 2019, ch. 126, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 126, S.L. 2019 provides, “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

Section 1 of this Act becomes effective on the thirtieth day after the adoption of an amendment to the United States Constitution which, in whole or in part, restores to the states the authority to prohibit abortion, or on the thirtieth day after the attorney general certifies to the legislative council:

1. The issuance of the judgment in any decision of the United States Supreme Court or the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit which would allow enforcement of section 1 of this Act; or

2. The issuance of the judgment in any decision of the United States Supreme Court which, in whole or in part, restores to the states authority to prohibit abortion.”

14-02.1-05.
Preserving life of a viable child — Penalty.

An abortion of a viable child may be performed only when there is in attendance a physician other than the physician performing the abortion who shall take control and provide immediate medical care for the viable child born as a result of the abortion. The physician performing it, and subsequent to the abortion, the physician required by this section to be in attendance, shall take all reasonable steps in keeping with good medical practice, consistent with the procedure used, to preserve the life and health of the unborn child. Failure to do so is a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 191, § 5.

14-02.1-05.1.
Determination of detectable heartbeat in unborn child before abortion — Exception.

Except when a medical emergency exists that prevents compliance with this subsection, an individual may not perform an abortion on a pregnant woman before determining, in accordance with standard medical practice, if the unborn child the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable heartbeat. Any individual who performs an abortion on a pregnant woman based on the exception in this subsection shall note in the pregnant woman’s medical records that a medical emergency necessitating the abortion existed.

If a physician performs an abortion on a pregnant woman before determining if the unborn child the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable heartbeat, that physician is subject to disciplinary action under section 43-17-31.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 119, § 1.

14-02.1-05.2.
Abortion after detectable heartbeat in unborn child prohibited — Exception — Penalty.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may not knowingly perform an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of the unborn child the pregnant woman is carrying and whose heartbeat has been detected according to the requirements of section 14-02.1-05.1.

An individual is not in violation of subsection 1 if that individual performs a medical procedure designed to or intended, in that individual’s reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of a pregnant woman, to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman, or to save the life of an unborn child.

Any individual who performs a medical procedure as described in subsection 1 shall declare in writing, under penalty of perjury, that the medical procedure is necessary, to the best of that individual’s reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. That individual also shall provide in that written document, under penalty of perjury, the medical condition of that pregnant woman that the medical procedure performed as described in subdivision a assertedly will address, and the medical rationale for the conclusion that the medical procedure is necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

The individual who performs a medical procedure as described in subdivision a shall place the written documentation required under subdivision b in the pregnant woman’s medical records and shall maintain a copy of the written documentation in the individual’s own records for at least seven years.

An individual is not in violation of subsection 1 if that individual has performed an examination for the presence of a heartbeat in the unborn child utilizing standard medical practice and that examination does not reveal a heartbeat in the unborn child or the individual has been informed by a physician who has performed the examination for the unborn child’s heartbeat that the examination did not reveal a heartbeat in the unborn child.

It is a class C felony for an individual to willingly perform an abortion in violation of subsection 1. The pregnant woman upon whom the abortion is performed in violation of subsection 1 may not be prosecuted for a violation of subsection 1 or for conspiracy to violate subsection 1.

This section does not prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a measure, drug, or chemical designed for contraceptive purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 119, § 2.

14-02.1-05.3.
Determination of postfertilization age — Abortion of unborn child of twenty or more weeks postfertilization age prohibited.

The purpose of this section is to protect the state’s compelling interest in the unborn human life from the time the unborn child is capable of feeling pain.

Except in the case of a medical emergency, an abortion may not be performed or induced or be attempted to be performed or induced unless the physician performing or inducing the abortion has first made a determination of the probable postfertilization age of the unborn child or relied upon such a determination made by another physician. In making the determination, the physician shall make those inquiries of the woman and perform or cause to be performed the medical examinations and tests as a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the medical conditions involved, would consider necessary to perform in making an accurate diagnosis with respect to postfertilization age.

Except in the case of a medical emergency, a person may not perform or induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion upon a woman when it has been determined, by the physician performing or inducing or attempting to perform or induce the abortion or by another physician upon whose determination that physician relies, that the probable postfertilization age of the woman’s unborn child is twenty or more weeks.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 116, § 3; 2013, ch. 35, § 8.

14-02.1-06.
Soliciting abortions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 50, § 79.

14-02.1-07.
Records required — Reporting of practice of abortion. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Records:

All abortion facilities and hospitals in which abortions are performed shall keep records, including admission and discharge notes, histories, results of tests and examinations, nurses’ worksheets, social service records, and progress notes, and shall further keep a copy of all written certifications provided for in this chapter as well as a copy of the constructive notice forms, consent forms, court orders, abortion data reports, adverse event reports, abortion compliance reports, and complication reports. All abortion facilities shall keep the following records:

The number of women who availed themselves of the opportunity to receive and view an ultrasound image of their unborn children pursuant to section 14-02.1-04, and the number who did not; and of each of those numbers, the number who, to the best of the reporting abortion facility’s information and belief, went on to obtain the abortion.

Postfertilization age:

If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be twenty or more weeks and an abortion was performed, the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

The medical records of abortion facilities and hospitals in which abortions are performed and all information contained therein must remain confidential and may be used by the state department of health only for gathering statistical data and ensuring compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Records must be maintained in the permanent files of the hospital or abortion facility for a period of not less than seven years.

Reporting:

An individual abortion compliance report and an individual abortion data report for each abortion performed upon a woman must be completed by her attending physician. The abortion data report must be confidential and may not contain the name of the woman. The abortion data report must include the data called for in the United States standard report of induced termination of pregnancy as recommended by the national center for health statistics.

All abortion compliance reports must be signed by the attending physician within twenty-four hours and submitted to the state department of health within ten business days from the date of the abortion. All abortion data and complication reports must be signed by the attending physician and submitted to the state department of health within thirty days from the date of the abortion. If a physician provides an abortion-inducing drug to another for the purpose of inducing an abortion and the physician knows that the individual experiences during or after the use an adverse event, the physician shall provide a written report of the adverse event within thirty days of the event to the state department of health and the federal food and drug administration via the medwatch reporting system. For purposes of this section, “adverse event” is defined based upon the federal food and drug administration criteria given in the medwatch reporting system. If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the abortion compliance report must state the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed. If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be twenty or more weeks and an abortion was performed, the abortion compliance report must state the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

A copy of the abortion report, any complication report, and any adverse event report must be made a part of the medical record of the patient at the facility or hospital in which the abortion was performed. In cases when post-abortion complications are discovered, diagnosed, or treated by physicians not associated with the facility or hospital where the abortion was performed, the state department of health shall forward a copy of the report to that facility or hospital to be made a part of the patient’s permanent record.

The state department of health is responsible for collecting all abortion compliance reports, abortion data reports, complication reports, and adverse event reports and collating and evaluating all data gathered from these reports and shall annually publish a statistical report based on data from abortions performed in the previous calendar year. All abortion compliance reports received by the state department of health are public records. Except for disclosure to a law enforcement officer or state agency, the department may not disclose an abortion compliance report without first removing any individually identifiable health information and any other demographic information, including race, marital status, number of previous live births, and education regarding the woman upon whom the abortion was performed.

The state department of health shall report to the attorney general any apparent violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 191, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2009, ch. 144, § 2; 2011, ch. 109, § 8; 2013, ch. 116, § 4.

14-02.1-07.
Records required — Reporting of practice of abortion. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Records:

All abortion facilities and hospitals in which abortions are performed shall keep records, including admission and discharge notes, histories, results of tests and examinations, nurses’ worksheets, social service records, and progress notes, and shall further keep a copy of all written certifications provided for in this chapter as well as a copy of the constructive notice forms, consent forms, court orders, abortion data reports, adverse event reports, abortion compliance reports, and complication reports. All abortion facilities shall keep the following records:

The number of women who availed themselves of the opportunity to receive and view an ultrasound image of their unborn children pursuant to section 14-02.1-04, and the number who did not; and of each of those numbers, the number who, to the best of the reporting abortion facility’s information and belief, went on to obtain the abortion.

Postfertilization age:

If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be twenty or more weeks and an abortion was performed, the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

The medical records of abortion facilities and hospitals in which abortions are performed and all information contained therein must remain confidential and may be used by the department of health and human services only for gathering statistical data and ensuring compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Records must be maintained in the permanent files of the hospital or abortion facility for a period of not less than seven years.

Reporting:

An individual abortion compliance report and an individual abortion data report for each abortion performed upon a woman must be completed by her attending physician. The abortion data report must be confidential and may not contain the name of the woman. The abortion data report must include the data called for in the United States standard report of induced termination of pregnancy as recommended by the national center for health statistics.

All abortion compliance reports must be signed by the attending physician within twenty-four hours and submitted to the department of health and human services within ten business days from the date of the abortion. All abortion data and complication reports must be signed by the attending physician and submitted to the department of health and human services within thirty days from the date of the abortion. If a physician provides an abortion-inducing drug to another for the purpose of inducing an abortion and the physician knows that the individual experiences during or after the use an adverse event, the physician shall provide a written report of the adverse event within thirty days of the event to the department of health and human services and the federal food and drug administration via the medwatch reporting system. For purposes of this section, “adverse event” is defined based upon the federal food and drug administration criteria given in the medwatch reporting system. If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the abortion compliance report must state the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed. If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be twenty or more weeks and an abortion was performed, the abortion compliance report must state the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed.

A copy of the abortion report, any complication report, and any adverse event report must be made a part of the medical record of the patient at the facility or hospital in which the abortion was performed. In cases when post-abortion complications are discovered, diagnosed, or treated by physicians not associated with the facility or hospital where the abortion was performed, the department of health and human services shall forward a copy of the report to that facility or hospital to be made a part of the patient’s permanent record.

The department of health and human services is responsible for collecting all abortion compliance reports, abortion data reports, complication reports, and adverse event reports and collating and evaluating all data gathered from these reports and shall annually publish a statistical report based on data from abortions performed in the previous calendar year. All abortion compliance reports received by the department of health and human services are public records. Except for disclosure to a law enforcement officer or state agency, the department may not disclose an abortion compliance report without first removing any individually identifiable health information and any other demographic information, including race, marital status, number of previous live births, and education regarding the woman upon whom the abortion was performed.

The department of health and human services shall report to the attorney general any apparent violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 191, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2009, ch. 144, § 2; 2011, ch. 109, § 8; 2013, ch. 116, § 4; 2021, ch. 352, § 29, effective September 1, 2022.

14-02.1-07.1.
Forms. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall make available to physicians, hospitals, and all abortion facilities the forms required by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 191, § 8; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

14-02.1-07.1.
Forms. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall make available to physicians, hospitals, and all abortion facilities the forms required by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 191, § 8; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 30, effective September 1, 2022.

14-02.1-08.
Protection of infant born alive — Penalty.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if the person knowingly, or negligently, causes the death of an infant born alive.

Whenever an unborn child who is the subject of abortion is born alive and is viable, it becomes an abandoned child and a child in need of protection, unless:

The termination of the pregnancy is necessary to preserve the life of the mother; or

The mother and her spouse, or either of them, have agreed in writing in advance of the abortion, or within seventy-two hours thereafter, to accept the parental rights and responsibilities for the unborn child if it survives the abortion procedure.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 191, § 7; 2011, ch. 109, § 9; 2021, ch. 245, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Experimentation on live fetus prohibited, see N.D.C.C. § 14-02.2-01.

14-02.1-09.
Humane disposal of nonviable unborn child. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The physician performing the abortion, if performed outside of a hospital, must see to it that the unborn child is disposed of in a humane fashion under regulations established by the state department of health. A licensed hospital in which an abortion is performed must dispose of a dead unborn child in a humane fashion in compliance with regulations promulgated by the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2011, ch. 109, § 10.

Cross-References.

Experimentation on fetus prohibited, see N.D.C.C. ch. 14-02.2.

14-02.1-09.
Humane disposal of nonviable unborn child. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The physician performing the abortion, if performed outside of a hospital, must see to it that the unborn child is disposed of in a humane fashion under regulations established by the department of health and human services. A licensed hospital in which an abortion is performed must dispose of a dead unborn child in a humane fashion in compliance with regulations promulgated by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2011, ch. 109, § 10; 2021, ch. 352, § 31, effective September 1, 2022.

14-02.1-10.
Concealing stillbirth or death of infant — Penalty.

It is a class A misdemeanor for a person to conceal the stillbirth of a fetus or to fail to report to a physician or to the county coroner the death of an infant under two years of age.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1.

14-02.1-11.
General penalty.

A person violating any provision of this chapter for which another penalty is not specifically prescribed is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Any person willfully violating a rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1.

14-02.1-12.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the North Dakota Abortion Control Act.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1.